Washington statutes.
RCW 4.96.010

Tortious conduct of local governmental entities—Liability for damages.

(1) All local governmental entities, whether acting in a governmental or proprietary capacity, shall be liable for damages arising out of their tortious conduct, or the tortious conduct of their past or present officers, employees, or volunteers while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties, to the same extent as if they were a private person or corporation. Filing a claim for damages within the time allowed by law shall be a condition precedent to the commencement of any action claiming damages. The laws specifying the content for such claims shall be liberally construed so that substantial compliance therewith will be deemed satisfactory.

(2) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, for the purposes of this chapter, "local governmental entity" means a county, city, town, special district, municipal corporation as defined in RCW 39.50.010, quasi-municipal corporation, any joint municipal utility services authority, any entity created by public agencies under RCW 39.34.030, or public hospital.

(3) For the purposes of this chapter, "volunteer" is defined according to RCW 51.12.035.

[ 2011 c 258 s 10; 2001 c 119 s 1; 1993 c 449 s 2; 1967 c 164 s 1.]

NOTES:

Short title—Purpose—Intent—2011 c 258: See RCW 39.106.010.

Purpose—1993 c 449: "This act is designed to provide a single, uniform procedure for bringing a claim for damages against a local governmental entity. The existing procedures, contained in chapter 36.45 RCW, counties, chapter 35.31 RCW, cities and towns, chapter 35A.31 RCW, optional municipal code, and chapter 4.96 RCW, other political subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal corporations, are revised and consolidated into chapter 4.96 RCW." [ 1993 c 449 s 1.]

Severability—1993 c 449: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 c 449 s 15.]

Purpose—1967 c 164: "It is the purpose of this act to extend the doctrine established in chapter 136, Laws of 1961, as amended, to all political subdivisions, municipal corporations and quasi municipal corporations of the state." [ 1967 c 164 s 17.]

Severability—1967 c 164: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1967 c 164 s 18.]